Utah statutes.
53B-14-107.   Judicial review of order -- Filing complaint -- Hearing de novo -- Stay of action on lien by tax commission.

(1)  Judicial review of an order of a hearing examiner issued under Section 53B-14-105 is obtained by any party by filing a complaint with the district court within 20 days after the date of the order.

(2)  If a complaint is filed, the matter is heard by the district court de novo.

(3)  A notice of the filing of a complaint may be filed with the State Tax Commission and, if filed, the tax commission shall take no action with respect to the lien created under Section 53B-14-106 until the matter is finally disposed of by the district court or on appeal from the district court, except as provided in this chapter.

